Wyoming, session 2026, HB0053.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-1-102(a)(xxiv), 22-9-125 by
creating a new subsection (e), 22-12-101 by creating a new
subsection (c), 22-14-102 and 22-15-109 are amended to
read:

22-1-102. Definitions.

HB0053

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0045
(a) The definitions contained in this chapter apply
to words and phrases used in this Election Code and govern
the construction of those words and phrases unless they are
specifically modified by the context in which they appear.
As used in this Election Code:

(xxiv) "Poll watcher" means a person certified
by the county chairman of a political party to observe
voter turn out, and voter registration and vote counting. A
"poll watcher" is not an election official;

22-9-125. Alternate procedures for collecting and
counting absentee ballots.

(e) The responsibilities of poll watchers specified
in W.S. 22-15-109 shall apply to any alternate procedures
implemented under this section.

22-12-101. Designation and notice of polling places;
external location; change in location.

HB0053

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0045
(c) The responsibilities of poll watchers specified
in W.S. 22-15-109 shall apply to the designation and notice
of polling places under this chapter.

22-14-102. Who may be present after all votes are
cast and polls close; making pollbooks agree; counting
votes.

After all the votes are cast and the polls are officially
declared closed, only election judges and poll watchers
shall be permitted in a polling place. When all ballots are
cast, the machine shall be locked against further voting
and sealed as prescribed by law. Except as otherwise
provided by W.S. 22-14-114(b), election judges shall
commence to count votes and shall continue without
adjournment until counting is completed. The
responsibilities of poll watchers specified in W.S.
22-15-109 shall apply to the procedures implemented and
used under this chapter.

22-15-109. Poll watchers; certification;
qualification; authority; removal.

HB0053

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0045
(a) The county chairman of each political party may
having a candidate on the ballot shall certify voluntary
poll watchers prior to the day of the election to serve in
each polling place places. The county chairmen of each
political party that does not have a candidate on the
ballot may certify volunteer poll watchers prior to the day
of the election to serve in polling places. Except as
otherwise provided in this subsection, not more than one
(1) poll watcher from each political party may serve
simultaneously unless the chief judge determines that one
(1) additional poll watcher from each political party may
be accommodated in the polling place without disrupting the
polling process. At polling places where multiple precincts
are served, there may be one (1) poll watcher for each
political party for each precinct served. More than one (1)
poll watcher may be present at the polling place for the
purposes of poll watchers switching shifts.

(b) A poll watcher shall belong to the political
party he represents and shall be a registered elector
residing in the county. A poll watcher shall serve only at
the polling place places designated on the certificate by
the county chairman in accordance with subsection (a) of
HB0053

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0045
this section. A poll watcher is authorized to observe
voter turn out and registration and every aspect of the
election. A poll watcher shall have the authority to be
located close enough to hear and see the voters as they
check in with election judges. A poll watcher may make
written memoranda but shall not challenge voters, attempt
to discern for whom an elector has voted, conduct
electioneering activities or disrupt the polling process. A
poll watcher shall not be prevented from observing all
activities and processes at polling places. Poll watchers
shall be allowed to observe polling place setup procedures
before the polls open and shut-down procedures after the
polls close on election day and during any absentee voting
period established under W.S. 22-9-125, 22-12-101 and
22-14-102.

(c) The chief judge may remove a poll watcher from
the polling place for disturbing the polling place, or for
any other violation of the Election Code. A county chairman
of a political party may, before or on the date of the
election, designate another certified poll watcher to
replace a poll watcher removed under this subsection and
shall notify the county clerk of the substitution. No poll
HB0053

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0045
watcher shall be denied the ability to watch the polls for
failure of a political party to provide a poll watching
schedule to the clerk before the election.

(d) For purposes of this section, certifications of
poll watchers under subsection (a) of this section shall be
considered delivered to the county clerk if sent
electronically by close of business the day before the
commencement of early voting and by close of business the
day before the opening of the polls on election day.
Certifications made before the start of early voting may be
amended at any time until the opening of polls on election
day. The certification shall identify the training
completed by the poll watchers.

(e) Poll watchers shall be provided chairs at the
polling places. Poll watchers shall not be restricted to a
chair.

(f) The county clerk may require poll watchers to
wear identification badges consistent with the size and
format of all other poll worker badges, to include the poll
watcher's name, party, polling location and the words "poll
HB0053

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0045
watcher". The county clerk shall require poll watchers to
pick up identification badges at the polling place on the
day of the election unless the county clerk allows poll
watchers to pick up identification badges before the day of
the election at a location other than the polling place.

(g) The secretary of state shall have the authority
to promulgate rules to ensure that poll watchers may carry
out their responsibilities under this section.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0053